Washington statutes.
RCW 10.21.900

Construction of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter may be construed as modifying or limiting the presumption of innocence.

[ 2010 c 254 s 11.]

NOTES:

Intent—Contingent effective date—2010 c 254: See notes following RCW 10.21.010.